Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act
383.675.
Waiver of landlord’s right to terminate.

Acceptance of rent with knowledge of a default by the tenant or acceptance of performance by him that varies from the terms of the rental agreement constitutes a waiver of the landlord’s right to terminate the rental agreement for that breach, unless otherwise agreed after the breach has occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 36; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 35, effective July 13, 1984.

383.680.
Landlord’s lien or security interest — Distraint for rent.

A lien or security interest on behalf of the landlord in the tenant’s household goods is not enforceable unless perfected before August 1, 1984.

Distraint for rent is abolished.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 36, effective July 13, 1984.

383.685.
Remedy after termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord may have a claim for possession and for rent and a separate claim for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement and reasonable attorney’s fees as provided in KRS 383.660(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 38; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 37, effective July 13, 1984.

383.690.
Recovery of possession limited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise, including willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of heat, electric, running water, hot water, gas, or other essential service to the tenant, except in case of abandonment, surrender, or as permitted in KRS

383.505

to

383.715

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 39; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 38, effective July 13, 1984.

383.695.
Periodic tenancy — Holdover remedies.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a week-to-week tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least seven (7) days before the termination date specified in the notice.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month-to-month tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least thirty (30) days before the periodic rental date specified in the notice.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a tenancy begun upon the termination of a written lease by written notice given to the other at least ten (10) days before the termination date specified in the notice, except that if the tenant fails to pay rent within ten (10) days after the day it becomes due, the landlord may terminate the tenancy at any time without notice.

If the tenant remains in possession without the landlord’s consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or its termination, the landlord may bring an action for possession and if the tenant’s holdover is willful and not in good faith the landlord may also recover an amount not more than three (3) months’ periodic rent or threefold the actual damages sustained by him, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If the landlord consents to the tenant’s continued occupancy, KRS 383.565(3) applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 40; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 39, effective July 13, 1984.

383.700.
Remedies for abuse of access.

If the tenant refuses to allow lawful access, the landlord may obtain injunctive relief to compel access, or terminate the rental agreement. In either case the landlord may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney’s fees.

If the landlord makes an unlawful entry or a lawful entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful but which have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the reoccurrence of the conduct or terminate the rental agreement. In either case the tenant may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 41; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 40, effective July 13, 1984.

383.705.
Retaliatory conduct.

Except as provided in this section, a landlord may not retaliate by increasing rent or decreasing services or by bringing or threatening to bring an action for possession after:

The tenant has complained to a governmental agency charged with responsibility for enforcement of a building or housing code of a violation applicable to the premises materially affecting health and safety;

The tenant has complained to the landlord of a violation under KRS

383.595

;

The tenant has organized or become a member of a tenant’s union or similar organization.

If the landlord acts in violation of subsection (1) of this section, the tenant is entitled to the remedies provided in KRS

383.655

and has a defense in any retaliatory action against him for possession. In an action by or against the tenant, evidence of a complaint within one (1) year before the alleged act of retaliation creates a presumption that the landlord’s conduct was in retaliation. The presumption does not arise if the tenant made the complaint after notice of a proposed rent increase or diminution of services. “Presumption” means that the trier of fact must find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a landlord may bring an action for possession if:

The violation of the applicable building or housing code was caused primarily by lack of reasonable care by the tenant or other person in his household or upon the premises with his consent;

The tenant is in default in rent; or

Compliance with the applicable building or housing code requires alteration, remodeling, or demolition which would effectively deprive the tenant of use of the dwelling unit.

The maintenance of an action under subsection (3) of this section does not release the landlord from liability under KRS 383.625(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 378, § 42; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 41, effective July 13, 1984.

383.710.
Validity of existing transactions. [Repealed.]

383.715.
Title of law.

KRS

383.505

to

383.705

shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.”

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 42, effective July 13, 1984.